Utah statutes.
49-13-201.   System membership -- Eligibility.

(1)  Beginning July 1, 1986, the state and its educational institutions shall participate in this system.

(a)  A person entering regular full-time employment with the state or its educational institutions after July 1, 1986, but before July 1, 2011, is eligible for service credit in this system.

(b)  A regular full-time employee of the state or its educational institutions prior to July 1, 1986, may either become eligible for service credit in this system or remain eligible for service in the system established under Chapter 12, Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act, by following the procedures established by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  An employer, other than the state and its educational institutions, may participate in this system except that once an employer elects to participate in this system, that election is irrevocable and the election must be made before July 1, 2011.

(a)  Until June 30, 2011, a person initially entering regular full-time employment with a participating employer which elects to participate in this system is eligible for service credit in this system.

(b)  A person in regular full-time employment with a participating employer prior to the participating employer's election to participate in this system may either become eligible for service credit in this system or remain eligible for service in the system established under Chapter 12, Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act, by following the procedures established by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections (1) and (2), a person initially entering employment with a participating employer on or after July 1, 2011, may not participate in this system.

